Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-250
Officers; powers, duties; compensation; power to prescribe.

A primary city may regulate and prescribe the powers and duties, and compensation of officers of the city not herein provided.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, L, p. 140;

R.S.1913, § 4460;

C.S.1922, § 3845;

C.S.1929, § 15-248;

R.S.1943, § 15-250.